North Dakota, session 69, HB1331.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATIVE ASSEMBLY OF NORTH DAKOTA:
SECTION 1. APPROPRIATION - NORTH DAKOTA STATE COLLEGE OF SCIENCE - ONE-TIME
FUNDING. There is appropriated from other funds derived from gifts, grants, donations, and other local
funds, the sum of $1,750,000, or so much of the sum as may be necessary, to the North Dakota state
college of science for the purpose of constructing an artificial turf playing surface, for the period
beginning with the effective date of this Act, and ending June 30, 2027. The funding appropriated in this
section includes up to $250,000 from dining services auxiliary revenues. The funding appropriated in
this section is considered a one-time funding item.
SECTION 2. EMERGENCY. This Act is declared to be an emergency measure.

H. B. NO. 1331 - PAGE 2
____________________________ ____________________________
Speaker of the House President of the Senate
____________________________ ____________________________
Chief Clerk of the House Secretary of the Senate
This certifies that the within bill originated in the House of Representatives of the Sixty-ninth Legislative
Assembly of North Dakota and is known on the records of that body as House Bill No. 1331 and that
two-thirds of the members-elect of the House of Representatives voted in favor of said law.
Vote: Yeas 79 Nays 3 Absent 12
____________________________ ____________________________
Speaker of the House Chief Clerk of the House
This certifies that two-thirds of the members-elect of the Senate voted in favor of said law.
Vote: Yeas 43 Nays 3 Absent 1
____________________________ ____________________________
President of the Senate Secretary of the Senate
Received by the Governor at ________M. on _____________________________________, 2025.
Approved at ________M. on __________________________________________________, 2025.
____________________________
Governor
Filed in this office this ___________day of _______________________________________, 2025,
at ________ o’clock ________M.
____________________________
Secretary of State